District of Columbia statutes.
47-827

Class actions.

Within 1 year after September 3, 1974, the Superior Court of the District of Columbia shall establish a method which it deems appropriate by which class action cases regarding any matter relating to real and personal property taxes may be brought before the Superior Court.

Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1057, Pub. L. 93-407, title IV, § 428
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

1981 Ed., § 47-827.
1973 Ed., § 47-648.

Prior Codifications